test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-joll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - jõll class A1â: # Adjective 'unwise' - full paradigm
    jõll+A+Pred+Sg: jõll
    jõll+A+Pred+Pl: jõõll
    jõll+A+Attr: jõõllâs
    jõll+A+Comp: jõõllab
    jõll+A+Superl: jõõllmõs
